North Carolina, session 2025, HB715.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
thirteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($13,300,000) in recurring funds for each year of
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide funds for slots to expand access for a child in this State
seeking to participate in the North Carolina Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H715-v-1*